Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1749
Pension or retirement plan; employee contribution authorized; manner of payment.

Any city or village of this state may pick up the employee contributions required by a pension or retirement plan for all compensation paid on or after January 1, 1986, and the contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer contributions in determining the federal tax treatment under the Internal Revenue Code, except that the city or village shall continue to withhold federal income taxes based upon such contributions until the Internal Revenue Service or the federal courts rule that, pursuant to section 414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, such contributions shall not be included as gross income of the employee until such time as they are distributed or made available. The city or village shall pay the employee contributions from the same source of funds which is used in paying earnings to the employees. The city or village shall pick up the contributions by a salary deduction either through a reduction in the cash salary of the employee or a combination of a reduction in salary and offset against a future salary increase. Employee contributions picked up shall be treated in the same manner and to the same extent as employee contributions made prior to the date picked up.

Laws 1985, LB 353, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 574, § 26.